Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201660-471
Motor vehicle, defined.

Motor vehicle means all vehicles propelled by any power other than muscular power. Motor vehicle does not include (1) bicycles as defined in section 60-611, (2) self-propelled chairs used by persons who are disabled, (3) farm tractors, (4) farm tractors used occasionally outside general farm usage, (5) road rollers, (6) vehicles which run only on rails or tracks, (7) electric personal assistive mobility devices as defined in section 60-618.02, and (8) off-road designed vehicles not authorized by law for use on a highway, including, but not limited to, go-carts, riding lawn mowers, garden tractors, all-terrain vehicles and utility-type vehicles as defined in section 60-6,355, minibikes as defined in section 60-636, and snowmobiles as defined in section 60-663.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 21;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 68;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 445;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 30;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 25;

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 12;

Laws 2015, LB95, § 7.